Maryland, session 2025, SB0517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “Public school employee” means a certificated professional individual
who is employed by a public school employer or an individual of equivalent status in
Baltimore City, except for a county superintendent or an individual designated by the
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0517*

SENATE BILL 517
public school employer to act in a negotiating capacity as provided in § 6–406(c) of this
subtitle.
(2) In Montgomery County, “public school employees” include:
(i) Certificated and noncertificated substitute teachers employed by
the public school employer for at least 7 days before March 1 of the school fiscal year ending
June 30, 1978, and each year after; and
(ii) Home and hospital teachers employed by the public school
employer for at least 7 days before March 1 of the school fiscal year ending June 30, 2000,
and each year after.
(3) In Baltimore County, “public school employee” includes a secondary
school nurse, an elementary school nurse, and a special school nurse.
(4) In Frederick County, “public school employee” includes a social worker
employed by a public school employer.
(5) In Prince George’s County, “public school employee” includes home and
hospital teachers and Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC) instructors.
(6) In Baltimore County, Calvert County, Charles County, and Garrett
County, “public school employee” includes Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC)
instructors.
(7) In Carroll County, “public school employee” includes:
(i) A registered nurse;
(ii) Supervisory noncertificated employees as defined under §
6–501(i) of this title; and
(iii) Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC) instructors.
(8) In Dorchester County, “public school employee” includes supervisory
noncertificated employees as defined under § 6–501(i) of this title.
(f) “Public school employer” means a county board of education or the Baltimore
City Board of School Commissioners.
6–408.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 517 3
(2) “ALTERNATIVE HIGH–QUALITY EDUCATOR CREDENTIAL” MEANS
A NON–NBC CERTIFICATION OR CREDENTIAL:
(I) AWARDED TO AN EDUCATOR FOR MEETING HIGH–QUALITY
STANDARDS ON AN ASSESSMENT IN A PROFESSIONAL FIELD OR SPECIALTY THAT
DOES NOT HAVE NBC STANDARDS; AND
(II) THAT HAS BEEN APPROVED JOINTLY BY THE STATE BOARD
AND THE PROFESSIONAL STANDARDS AND TEACHER EDUCATION BOARD.
(3) “NBC” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 6–1001 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) (I) “QUALIFIED EDUCATOR” MEANS A PUBLIC SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE WHO PROVIDES DIRECT INSTRUCTION OR SERVICES TO STUDENTS IN A
PUBLIC SCHOOL.
(II) “QUALIFIED EDUCATOR” DOES NOT INCLUDE A TEACHER,
AS DEFINED IN § 6–1001 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THE MINIMUM SALARY FOR ALL PUBLIC
SCHOOL EMPLOYEES SHALL BE $60,000.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, BEGINNING JULY 1,
2025, SALARY INCREASES FOR QUALIFIED EDUCATORS SHALL, AT A MINIMUM,
INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:
(1) FOR AN INITIAL AWARD OF AN NBC OR ALTERNATIVE
HIGH–QUALITY EDUCATOR CREDENTIAL – $10,000 SALARY INCREASE; AND
(2) FOR A QUALIFIED EDUCATOR ASSIGNED TO A LOW–PERFORMING
SCHOOL AS IDENTIFIED BY THE COUNTY BOARD – $7,000 SALARY INCREASE.
(D) (1) IF A QUALIFIED EDUCATOR IS ELIGIBLE FOR MORE THAN ONE
SALARY INCREASE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE QUALIFIED
EDUCATOR SHALL RECEIVE ALL SALARY INCREASES THAT APPLY.
(2) A QUALIFIED EDUCATOR WHO RECEIVES A SALARY INCREASE
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION FOR TEACHING AT A
LOW–PERFORMING SCHOOL MAY NOT LOSE THAT SALARY INCREASE WHILE
TEACHING AT THE SCHOOL EVEN IF THE SCHOOL CEASES TO BE LOW–PERFORMING.
(E) THE QUALIFIED EDUCATOR SALARY INCREASES DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY UNTIL § 6–1002(A) OF THIS TITLE

SENATE BILL 517
BECOMES EFFECTIVE AS RECOMMENDED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND APPROVED BY
THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD.
6–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “NBC” means National Board Certification issued by the National Board for
Professional Teaching Standards.
(e) (1) “Teacher” means a certified public school employee who is primarily
responsible and accountable for teaching the students in the class.
(2) “Teacher” does not include, unless otherwise provided:
(i) Curriculum specialists;
(ii) Instructional aides;
(iii) Attendance personnel;
(iv) Psychologists;
(v) Social workers;
(vi) Clerical personnel;
(vii) An individual with a Resident Teacher Certificate; or
(viii) An individual with a certification for career professionals.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.